North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-09 State Seed Department [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11]

4-09-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-02.
Seed department — Offices and laboratories. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-02.1.
Limitation on authority of political subdivisions regarding seed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-03.
State seed commission — Members — Meetings — Appointment and duties of commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-03.1.
State seed arbitration board — Compensation and expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 60, § 31.

4-09-04.
Official seal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-05.
Rulemaking and delegating authority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-05.1.
Noxious weed seeds — Classifications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-06.
Examination of seed by commissioner — Right of access to premises — Stop-sale order. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-06.1.
Inspection — Export certification — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-07.
Certificates and reports — Publication. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-08.
Public laboratory service — Fees for tests. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-09.
Testing seeds and plants — Regulations made by commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-10.
Labeling requirements for agricultural seed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-10.1.
Labeling requirements for bagged agricultural seed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 60, § 31.

4-09-11.
Labeling requirements for vegetable seed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-11.1.
Labeling requirements for flower seed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-11.2.
Labeling requirements for tree and shrub seeds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-12.
Invoice and records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-13.
Tolerances. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-13.1.
Seed classification system — Weed tolerances. [Repealed]

Expired under S.L. 2001, ch. 62, § 4.

4-09-14.
Prohibitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-14.1.
Seed sales — Seed labeling fee permit — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-14.2.
Seed labeling fee permit — Cost added to selling price. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-14.3.
Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 60, § 31.

4-09-14.4.
Permit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-15.
Exemptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-16.
Certified seed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-17.
Certified seed — Regulations governing labeling and representing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-17.1.
Plant Variety Protection Act. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-18.
Certified seed standards. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-19.
Cooperation by commissioner with institutions, agencies, and organizations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-20.
Fees and collections — Disposition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-20.1.
Liability of commission, department, commissioner, and certified or noncertified agricultural seed producers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-20.2.
Seed arbitration board — Petition — Arbitration hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-21.
Enforcement — Hearing by commissioner — Application of chapter 28-32. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-22.
Prosecution for violations — Duty of attorney general and state’s attorney. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-23.
Seizure and injunction — Action. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-24.
Penalty — Criminal — Civil. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09-25.
Plant and seed records — Exempt. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.